District of Columbia statutes.
7-2123

Access to emergency care for victims of sexual assault.

All hospitals that provide emergency care to victims of sexual assault shall:

(1)

Provide each victim of sexual assault written information developed pursuant to § 7-2122;

(2)

Provide each victim of sexual assault an oral explanation of the written information distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this section;

(3)

Orally inform each victim of sexual assault in a language he or she understands of the option to be provided by the hospital prophylactic antibiotics for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases and emergency contraception for the prevention of pregnancy; and

(4)

Consistent with accepted medical practice and protocols, immediately provide prophylactic antibiotics for the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases and emergency contraception for the prevention of pregnancy to each victim of sexual assault, if the victim requests it and if the requested treatment is not medically contraindicated.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-346, § 4, 56 DCR 966